West Virginia, session 2025, HB2896.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 3. ELECTIONS. ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS. §3-1-16. Election of state officers. (a) At the general election to be held in 1968, and every fourth year thereafter, there shall be elected a Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer, Auditor, Attorney General and Commissioner of Agriculture. At the general election in 1968, and every second year thereafter, there shall be elected a member of the State Senate for each senatorial district, and a member or members of the House of Delegates of the state from each county or each delegate district. At the general election in 2026, and every fourth year thereafter, there shall be elected three commissioners to the Public Service Commission.(b) At the time of the primary election to be held in the year 2016, and every twelfth year thereafter, there shall be elected one justice of the Supreme Court of Appeals, and at the time of the primary election to be held in 2020, and every 12th year thereafter, two justices of the Supreme Court of Appeals and at the time of the primary election to be held in 2024, and every twelfth year thereafter, two justices of the Supreme Court of Appeals. Effective with the primary election held in the year 2016, the election of justices of the Supreme Court of Appeals shall be on a nonpartisan basis and by division as set forth more fully in article five of this chapter.(c) At the time of the primary election to be held in the year 2024, and every tenth year thereafter, there shall be elected one judge to a seat of the Intermediate Court of Appeals; at the time of the primary election to be held in 2026, and every 10th year thereafter, one judge to a seat of the Intermediate Court of Appeals; and at the time of the primary election to be held in 2028, and every 10th year thereafter, one judge to a seat of the Intermediate Court of Appeals. Effective with the primary election held in the year 2024, the election of Judges of the Intermediate Court of Appeals shall be on a nonpartisan basis and by division as set forth more fully in §3-5-1 et seq. of this code. ARTICLE 5. PRIMARY ELECTIONS AND NOMINATING PROCEDURES. §3-5-13a. Order of offices and candidates on the ballot; uniform drawing date. (a) The order of offices for state and county elections on all ballots within the state shall be as prescribed herein. When the office does not appear on the ballot in an election, then it shall be omitted from the sequence. When an unexpired term for an office appears on the ballot along with a full term, the unexpired term shall appear immediately below the full term.NATIONAL TICKET: President (and Vice President in the general election), United States Senator, member of the United States House of Representatives.STATE TICKET: Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor, Treasurer, Commissioner of Agriculture, Attorney General, State Senator, member of the House of Delegates, Commissioner of Public Service Commission, any other multicounty office, state executive committee.NONPARTISAN JUDICIAL BALLOT: Justice of the Supreme Court of Appeals, judge of the circuit court, family judge, magistrate.COUNTY TICKET: Clerk of the circuit court, county commissioner, clerk of the county commission, prosecuting attorney, sheriff, assessor, surveyor, congressional district executive committee, senatorial district executive committee in multicounty districts, delegate district executive committee in multicounty districts.NONPARTISAN BALLOT: Nonpartisan elections for board of education, conservation district supervisor, any question to be voted upon.DISTRICT TICKET: County executive committee.NATIONAL CONVENTION: Delegate to the national convention -- congressional district, delegate to the national convention -- at-large.(b) Except for office divisions in which no more than one person has filed a certificate of announcement, the arrangement of names for all offices shall be determined by lot according to the following provisions:(1) On the fourth Tuesday following the close of the candidate filing, beginning at 9:00 a.m., a drawing by lot shall be conducted in the office of the clerk of the county commission in each county. Notice of the drawing shall be given on the form for the certificate of announcement and no further notice shall be required. The clerk of the county commission shall superintend and conduct the drawing and the method of conducting the drawing shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State.(2) Except as provided herein, the position of each candidate within each office division shall be determined by the position drawn for that candidate individually: Provided, That if fewer candidates file for an office division than the total number to be nominated or elected, the vacant positions shall appear following the names of all candidates for the office.(3) Candidates for delegate to national convention who have filed a commitment to a candidate for president shall be listed alphabetically within the group of candidates committed to the same candidate for president and uncommitted candidates shall be listed alphabetically in an uncommitted category. The position of each group of committed candidates and uncommitted candidates shall be determined by lot by drawing the names of the presidential candidates and for an uncommitted category.(4) A candidate or the candidate's representative may attend the drawings. ARTICLE 10. FILLING VACANCIES. §3-10-3. Vacancies in offices of state officials, justices, judges, and magistrates. (a) Any vacancy occurring in the offices of Secretary of State, Auditor, Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of Agriculture, or Commissioner of the Public Service Commission, in any office created or made elective to be filled by the voters of the entire state, is filled by the Governor of the state by appointment and subsequent election to fill the remainder of the term, if required by §3-10-1 of this code. The Governor shall make the appointment from a list of three legally qualified persons submitted by the party executive committee of the same political party with which the person holding the office immediately preceding the vacancy was affiliated at the time the vacancy occurred. The list of qualified persons to fill the vacancy shall be submitted to the Governor within 15 days after the vacancy occurs, and the Governor shall duly make his or her appointment to fill the vacancy from the list of legally qualified persons within five days after the list is received. If the list is not submitted to the Governor within the 15-day period, the Governor shall appoint, within five days thereafter, a legally qualified person of the same political party with which the person holding the office immediately preceding the vacancy was affiliated at the time the vacancy occurred: Provided, That the provisions of this subsection do not apply to §3-10-3(b), §3-10-3(c), §3-10-3(d), and §3-10-3(e) of this code.(b) Any vacancy occurring in the offices of Justice of the Supreme Court of Appeals, judge of the Intermediate Court of Appeals, judge of a circuit court, or judge of a family court is filled by the Governor of the state by appointment and, if the unexpired term be for a period of more than three years, by a subsequent election to fill the remainder of the term, as required by §3-10-3(d) of this code. If an election is required under §3-10-3(d) of this code, the Governor, circuit court, or the chief judge thereof in vacation, is responsible for the proper proclamation by order and notice required by §3-10-1 of this code.  The amendments to this subsection enacted during the regular session of the Legislature in the year 2022 shall be applicable to any vacancy existing at the date of passage of such amendments.(c) Any vacancy in the office of magistrate is appointed according to the provisions of §50-1-6 of this code, and, if the unexpired term be for a period of more than two years, by a subsequent election to fill the remainder of the term, as required by §3-10-3(d) of this code.  (d) (1) When the vacancy in the office of Justice of the Supreme Court of Appeals, judge of the Intermediate Court of Appeals, judge of the circuit court, judge of a family court, or magistrate occurs after the 84th day before a general election, and the affected term of office ends on December 31 following the succeeding general election two years later, the person appointed to fill the vacancy shall continue in office until the completion of the term.(2) When the vacancy occurs before the close of the candidate filing period for the primary election, and if the unexpired term be for a period of greater than three years, the vacancy shall be filled by election in the nonpartisan judicial election held concurrently with the primary election and the appointment shall continue until a successor is elected and certified.(3) When the vacancy occurs after the close of candidate filing for the primary election and not later than 84 days before the general election, and if the unexpired term be for a period of greater than three years, the vacancy shall be filled by election in a nonpartisan judicial election held concurrently with the general election, and the appointment shall continue until a successor is elected and certified.(e) When an election to fill a vacancy is required to be held at the general election, according to the provisions of §3-10-3(d) of this code, a special candidate filing period shall be established. Candidates seeking election to any unexpired term for Justice of the Supreme Court of Appeals, judge of the Intermediate Court of Appeals, judge of a circuit court, judge of the family court, or magistrate shall file a certificate of announcement and pay the filing fee no earlier than the first Monday in August and no later than 77 days before the general election. CHAPTER 24. PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION. ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS. §24-1-3.  Commission continued; membership; chairman; compensation; quorum. (a) The Public Service Commission of West Virginia is continued and directed as provided by this chapter, chapter 24A, chapter 24B, and chapter 24D of this code. The Public Service Commission may sue and be sued by that name.(b) Beginning in 2026, the Public Service Commission shall consist of three members who shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate are elected pursuant to §3-1-16 to a term of four years. The commissioners shall be citizens and residents of this state. and at least one of them shall be duly licensed to practice law in West Virginia, with not less than ten years’ actual work experience in the legal profession as a member of a State Bar.(c) No more than two of the commissioners shall be members of the same political party(d) (c) Each commissioner shall, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, take and subscribe to the oath provided by section five, article IV of the Constitution of West Virginia. The oath shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.(e) (d)The Governor commissioners shall designate one of the commissioners to serve as chairman at the Governor’s will and pleasure for a two-year term. The chairman shall be the chief administrative officer of the commission. The Governor may remove any commissioner only for incompetency, neglect of duty, gross immorality, malfeasance in office or violation of subsections (g) and (h) of this section.(f) (e) Upon expiration of the terms, appointments are for terms of six years, except that an Upon a vacancy, the Governor shall make an appointment to fill a vacancy is for the unexpired term only. (g) (f) No person while in the employ of, or holding any official relation to, any public utility subject to the provisions of this chapter or holding any stocks or bonds of a public utility subject to the provisions of this chapter or who is pecuniarily interested in a public utility subject to the provisions of this chapter may serve as a member of the commission or as an employee of the commission.(h) (g) Nor may any commissioner be a candidate for or hold public office or be a member of any political committee while acting as a commissioner; nor may any commissioner or employee of the commission receive any pass, free transportation or other thing of value, either directly or indirectly, from any public utility or motor carrier subject to the provisions of this chapter. In case any of the commissioners becomes a candidate for any public office or a member of any political committee, the Governor shall remove him or her from office and shall appoint a new commissioner to fill the vacancy created.(i) (h)The annual salary of each commissioner provided in §6-7-2A of this code shall be paid at least twice per month from the special funds in the percentages that follow:(1) From the Public Service Commission Fund collected under the provisions of §24-3-6 of this code, 80 percent;(2) From the Public Service Commission Motor Carrier Fund collected under the provisions of §24A-6-6 of this code, 17 percent; and(3) From the Public Service Commission Gas Pipeline Safety Fund collected under the provisions of §24B-5-3 of this code, three percent.(j) (i) In addition to the salary provided for all commissioners in §6-7-2a of this code, the chairman of the commission shall receive $5,000 per annum to be paid at least twice per month from the Public Service Commission Fund collected under the provisions of §24-3-6 of this code.